Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 1. Administration.
Sec. 38.05.036.
Audit of royalty and net profit payments and costs.

The department may conduct audits regarding royalty and net profits under oil and gas contracts, agreements, or leases under this chapter and regarding costs related to exploration licenses entered into under AS

38.05.131

—

38.05.134

and exploration incentive credits under this chapter. For purposes of an audit under this section,

the department may examine the books, papers, records, or memoranda of a person regarding matters related to the audit; and

the records and premises where a business is conducted shall be open at all reasonable times for inspection by the department.

The Department of Revenue may obtain from the department information relating to royalty and net profits payments and to exploration incentive credits under this chapter, whether or not that information is confidential. The Department of Revenue may use the information in carrying out its functions and responsibilities under AS 43, and shall hold that information confidential to the extent required by an agreement with the department or by AS

38.05.035(a)(8)

or AS

43.05.230

.

The department may obtain from the Department of Revenue all information obtained under AS 43 relating to royalty and net profits and to exploration incentive credits. The department may use the information for purposes of carrying out its responsibilities and functions under this chapter. Information made available to the department that was obtained under AS 43 is confidential and subject to the provisions of AS

43.05.230

.

[Repealed, § 8 ch 92 SLA 2003.]

[Repealed, § 8 ch 92 SLA 2003.]

Except as otherwise provided in this section or in connection with official investigations or proceedings of the department, it is unlawful for a current or former officer, employee, or agent of the state to divulge information obtained by the department as a result of an audit under this section that is required by an agreement with the department or by AS

38.05.035(a)(8)

to be kept confidential.

Nothing in this section prohibits the publication of statistics in a manner that maintains the confidentiality of information to the extent required by an agreement with the department or by AS

38.05.035(a)(8)

.

A person who knowingly violates (f) of this section commits the crime of misuse of confidential information under AS

11.56.860

. In this subsection, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

In the course of carrying out its responsibilities under this section, the department may subpoena any person to appear and produce books, records, papers, or memoranda bearing upon matters relating to an audit under this section and to give testimony or answer interrogatories under oath regarding those matters. The department may administer oaths to persons who are so subpoenaed. A subpoena issued under this section may compel attendance of a witness or production of a document or thing, located inside or outside the state, to the maximum extent permitted by law. The authority to issue a subpoena under this section may not be delegated by the commissioner.

A subpoena may be served by the commissioner of public safety or a peace officer designated by the commissioner of public safety, by a person designated by the department, or as otherwise provided by law. A subpoena may also be served by registered or certified mail for delivery restricted only to the person subpoenaed. The return delivery receipt must be addressed so that the receipt is returned to the department.

If a person who is subpoenaed neglects or refuses to obey the subpoena issued as provided in this section, the department may report the fact to the superior court or the appropriate court of another jurisdiction, and may seek an order from the court compelling obedience to the subpoena. The court, to the maximum extent permitted by law, may compel obedience to the subpoena to the same extent as witnesses may be compelled to obey the subpoenas of the court.

The department may conduct audits under this section concurrently with Department of Revenue audits or investigations under AS 43.

History.

(§ 2 ch 61 SLA 1980; am §§ 1 — 4, 8 ch 92 SLA 2003; am § 12 ch 49 SLA 2004; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 1 SSLA 2007; am §§ 2 – 6 ch 4 4SSLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), (b) and (c), deleted “or under AS 41.09” following “under this chapter”; in (f) and (g), deleted “or AS 41.09.010(d)” following “38.05.035(a)(8)”; made a stylistic change.

Sec. 38.05.037.
Zoning regulations in the unorganized borough.

In areas of the state outside first, second, or third class boroughs where there is no municipality with a zoning power, the division of lands shall exercise the zoning power by adopting zoning regulations.

The division of lands may exercise its zoning power

within federal land in the unorganized borough only at the times and in the areas it is requested to do so by the Secretary of the Interior to facilitate sales of federal land within the unorganized borough under P.L. 88-608, 78 Stat. 988;

[Repealed, § 44 ch 24 SLA 2003.]

Any zoning done by the division of lands under (b) of this section is final unless disapproved by concurrent resolution at the next regular session of the legislature.

History.

(§ 6 ch 118 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 93 SLA 1977; am § 14 ch 138 SLA 1977; am § 44 ch 24 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For management of municipal trust land, see 3 AAC 190, art. 4.

For zoning district regulations, see 11 AAC 91, art. 2.

For designation of districts, see 11 AAC 91, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The zoning power vested in the Department of Natural Resources under this section is broad enough to encompass the creation of historical districts as a control over land use, but the exercise of that authority does not make the property eligible for historic preservation loans under AS 45.98, which is aimed solely at historic districts established by municipalities. January 3, 1980, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.040.
Director shall be bonded. [Repealed, § 38 ch 91 SLA 1997.]